src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_haahad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - haahâđ: # 
    haahâđ+V+Inf: haahâđ
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haavâm
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: haavah
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hááhá
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: hähheen
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: hahâvettee
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: haahâv
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: haahâp
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hahâvetteđ
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: häähih
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: haahim
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: haahih
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: haavâi
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: havváim
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: havváid
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: havváin
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: haavâim
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: haavâid
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hahhii
    haahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: havâččim
    haahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: havâččih
    haahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: havâččij
    haahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: havâččáim
    haahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: havâččáid
    haahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: havâččáin
    haahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: havâččijm
    haahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: havâččijd
    haahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: havâččii
    haahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: hävveem
    haahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: hävveeh
    haahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: haavâš
    haahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: havâžeen
    haahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: haavâšvettee
    haahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: havâžává
    haahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: havâžep
    haahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: haavâšvetteđ
    haahâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: havâžeh
    haahâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: haavâ
    haahâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: havos
    haahâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: hahhoon
    haahâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: hähhee
    haahâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: hahhoos
    haahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: hahhoop
    haahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: haahâđ
    haahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: hahhoos
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: haavâ
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: haahâm
    haahâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: havâččii
    haahâđ+V+PrsPrc: hähhee
    haahâđ+V+PrfPrc: haahâm
    haahâđ+V+Actio+Nom: haahâm
    haahâđ+V+Actio+Ess: hahâmin
    haahâđ+V+Actio+Loc: hahâmist
    haahâđ+V+Actio+Ill: hahâmân
    haahâđ+V+Ger: havâdijn
    haahâđ+V+VAbess: havâhánnáá
